Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2008
Defendants tried together; number of peremptory challenges allowed.

If two or more persons be put on trial at the same time, each must be allowed his separate peremptory challenge, and in such cases the attorney prosecuting on behalf of the state shall be allowed such peremptory challenges for each of such defendants as are allowed by law.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 470, p. 827;

R.S.1913, § 9111;

Laws 1915, c. 167, § 1, p. 338;

C.S.1922, § 10136;

C.S.1929, § 29-2008;

R.S.1943, § 29-2008.

When defendants, being tried together, do not demand full number of challenges allowed, their rights thereto are waived. Nash v. State, 110 Neb. 712, 194 N.W. 869 (1923).